Washington statutes.
RCW 2.10.200

Hearing prior to judicial review—Conduct.

A hearing shall be held by the department of retirement systems, or an authorized representative, in the county of the residence of the claimant at a time and place designated by the director. Such hearings shall be de novo and shall conform to the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW. The retirement system may appear in all such proceedings and introduce testimony in support of the decision. Judicial review of any final decision by the director is governed by the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW.

[ 1989 c 175 s 37; 1971 ex.s. c 267 s 20.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1989 c 175: See note following RCW 34.05.010.